Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-242a.1 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act, “perinatal period” means the period


beginning when a woman becomes pregnant and ending one (1) year


after the woman gives birth.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-242a.2 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 3026 Page 1


A. Any health care provider who conducts a visit with a mother


or infant during the perinatal period shall conduct a mental health


screening of the mother to check for signs of perinatal depression


and anxiety.


B. To the extent allowed under state and federal privacy laws,


health care providers shall share data with the State Department of


Health for the purpose of implementing Section 4 of this act.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-242a.3 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall develop and make


available to the public a website and a mobile application that


provide information on programs, services, and other resources for


women and infants during the perinatal period. The information and


resources shall be designed to ease access to health care, mental


health services, public assistance programs, and other available


public and private supports and to improve maternal health, mental


health, and infant health outcomes.


B. The Department may use the website and application to


conduct a survey on maternal health, mental health, and infant


health for the purpose of fulfilling the requirements of Section 4


of this act.


C. The Department may enter into one or more contracts as


necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

Req. No. 3026 Page 2


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-242a.4 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Health shall collect data on


maternal health, mental health, and infant health outcomes through


available sources which may include, but shall not be limited to:


1. Data reported by health care providers under Section 2 of


this act;


2. Data obtained through surveys under Section 3 of this act;


and


3. Data obtained through the Behavioral Risk Factor


Surveillance System.


B. The Department shall compile the data into an annual report


on maternal health, mental health, and infant health outcomes that


includes incidence of perinatal depression and anxiety and


categorizes data by age, ethnicity, and other relevant demographic


factors.


C. The report shall be published on the Department’s website


and shall be electronically submitted to the President Pro Tempore


of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the


Governor.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3026 DC 1/15/2026 10:55:22 AM

Req. No. 3026 Page 3